District of Columbia statutes.
36-101

Filing and publication of bottle description.

All manufacturers and vendors of mineral waters and other beverages allowed by law to be sold in bottles, upon which their names or marks shall be respectively impressed, may file with the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia a description of such bottles and of the names or marks thereon, and shall cause the same to be published for not less than 2 weeks successively in a daily or weekly newspaper published in the District.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1333, ch. 854, § 877
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 263, Pub. L. 89-493, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-101.
1973 Ed., § 48-101.